Utah statutes.
59-27-105.   Sexually explicit business and escort service fund.
(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund called the "Sexually
Explicit Business and Escort Service Fund."
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the fund consists of all
amounts collected by the commission under this chapter.
(b) (i)  The money in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer
pursuant to Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.
(ii)  All interest or other earnings derived from the fund money shall be
deposited in the fund.
(3)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the commission may
retain an amount of tax collected under this chapter of not to exceed the
lesser of:
(a)  1.5%; or
(b)  an amount equal to the cost to the commission of administering this
chapter.
(4) (a)  Fund money shall be used as provided in this Subsection (4).
(b)  The Department of Corrections shall use 60% of the money in the fund, in
addition to existing budgets, to provide treatment services to nonworking or
indigent adults who:
(i)  have been convicted of an offense under Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4,
Sexual Offenses; and
(ii)  are not currently confined or incarcerated in a jail or prison.
(c)  The Adult Probation and Parole section of the Department of Corrections
shall use 15% of the money in the fund to provide outpatient treatment
services to individuals who:
(i)  have been convicted of an offense under Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4,
Sexual Offenses; and
(ii)  are not currently confined or incarcerated in a jail or prison.
(d)  The Department of Corrections shall use 10% of the money in the fund, in
addition to existing budgets, to implement treatment programs for juveniles
who have been convicted of an offense under Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4,
Sexual Offenses.
(e)  The attorney general shall use 15% of the money in the fund to provide
funding for any task force:
(i)  administered through the Office of the Attorney General; and
(ii)  that investigates and prosecutes individuals who use the Internet to
commit crimes against children.
